Illinois, session 104th, HB1396.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 601 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/601)  (from Ch. 120, par. 6-601)7    Sec. 601. Payment on due date of return. 8    (a) In general. Every taxpayer required to file a return 9under this Act shall, without assessment, notice or demand, 10pay any tax due thereon to the Department, at the place fixed 11for filing, on or before the date fixed for filing such return 12(determined without regard to any extension of time for filing 13the return) pursuant to regulations prescribed by the 14Department. If, however, the due date for payment of a 15taxpayer's federal income tax liability for a tax year (as 16provided in the Internal Revenue Code or by Treasury 17regulation, or as extended by the Internal Revenue Service) is 18later than the date fixed for filing the taxpayer's Illinois 19income tax return for that tax year, the Department may, by 20rule, prescribe a due date for payment that is not later than 21the due date for payment of the taxpayer's federal income tax 22liability. For purposes of the Illinois Administrative 23Procedure Act, the adoption of rules to prescribe a later due   HB1396- 2 -LRB104 08317 HLH 18368 b1date for payment shall be deemed an emergency and necessary 2for the public interest, safety, and welfare.3    (b) Amount payable. In making payment as provided in this 4section there shall remain payable only the balance of such 5tax remaining due after giving effect to the following:6        (1) Withheld tax. Any amount withheld during any 7    calendar year pursuant to Article 7 from compensation paid 8    to a taxpayer shall be deemed to have been paid on account 9    of any tax imposed by subsections 201(a) and (b) of this 10    Act on such taxpayer for his taxable year beginning in 11    such calendar year. If more than one taxable year begins 12    in a calendar year, such amount shall be deemed to have 13    been paid on account of such tax for the last taxable year 14    so beginning.15        (2) Estimated and tentative tax payments. Any amount 16    of estimated tax paid by a taxpayer pursuant to Article 8 17    for a taxable year shall be deemed to have been paid on 18    account of the tax imposed by this Act for such taxable 19    year.20        (3) Foreign tax. The aggregate amount of tax which is 21    imposed upon or measured by income and which is paid by a 22    resident for a taxable year to another state or states on 23    income which is also subject to the tax imposed by 24    subsections 201(a) and (b) of this Act shall be credited 25    against the tax imposed by subsections 201(a) and (b) 26    otherwise due under this Act for such taxable year. For   HB1396- 3 -LRB104 08317 HLH 18368 b1    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 2009, the 2    aggregate credit provided under this paragraph shall not 3    exceed that amount which bears the same ratio to the tax 4    imposed by subsections 201(a) and (b) otherwise due under 5    this Act as the amount of the taxpayer's base income 6    subject to tax both by such other state or states and by 7    this State bears to his total base income subject to tax by 8    this State for the taxable year. For taxable years ending 9    on or after December 31, 2009, the credit provided under 10    this paragraph for tax paid to other states shall not 11    exceed that amount which bears the same ratio to the tax 12    imposed by subsections 201(a) and (b) otherwise due under 13    this Act as the amount of the taxpayer's base income that 14    would be allocated or apportioned to other states if all 15    other states had adopted the provisions in Article 3 of 16    this Act bears to the taxpayer's total base income subject 17    to tax by this State for the taxable year. This subsection 18    is exempt from the 30-day threshold set forth in 19    subparagraph (iii) of paragraph (B) of item (2) of 20    subsection (a) of Section 304. Beginning with tax years 21    ending on or after December 31, 2025, this subsection 22    shall be applied without regard to subsection (c-5) of 23    Section 305. The credit provided by this paragraph shall 24    not be allowed if any creditable tax was deducted in 25    determining base income for the taxable year. Any person 26    claiming such credit shall attach a statement in support   HB1396- 4 -LRB104 08317 HLH 18368 b1    thereof and shall notify the Director of any refund or 2    reductions in the amount of tax claimed as a credit 3    hereunder all in such manner and at such time as the 4    Department shall by regulations prescribe.5        (4) Accumulation and capital gain distributions. If 6    the net income of a taxpayer includes amounts included in 7    his base income by reason of Section 667 of the Internal 8    Revenue Code (relating to accumulation and capital gain 9    distributions by a trust, respectively), the tax imposed 10    on such taxpayer by this Act shall be credited with his pro 11    rata portion of the taxes imposed by this Act on such trust 12    for preceding taxable years which would not have been 13    payable for such preceding years if the trust had in fact 14    made distributions to its beneficiaries at the times and 15    in the amounts specified in Sections 666 and 669 of the 16    Internal Revenue Code. The credit provided by this 17    paragraph shall not reduce the tax otherwise due from the 18    taxpayer to an amount less than that which would be due if 19    the amounts included by reason of Section 667 of the 20    Internal Revenue Code were excluded from his or her base 21    income.22    (c) Cross reference. For application against tax due of 23overpayments of tax for a prior year, see Section 909.24(Source: P.A. 101-585, eff. 8-26-19.) 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 26becoming law.